North Dakota, session 69, SB2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 15.1-13-26 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. As used in this section:
a. "Conviction" means a finding of guilt, a guilty plea, a plea of no contest, a plea of
nolo contendere, a judgment of conviction even though the court suspended execution of
sentence in accordance with subsection 3 of section 12.1-32-02, or a deferred imposition
of sentence in accordance with subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02 or an equivalent
statute. The term does not include a finding of guilt overturned on appeal.
b. "Crime against a child" means violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, 12.1-16-03,
12.1-16-04, 12.1-17-01.1, 12.1-17-02, 12.1-17-03, 12.1-17-04, 12.1-17-05, 12.1-17-06,
12.1-17-07, 12.1-17-07.1, 12.1-17-10, 12.1-18-01, 12.1-18-02, 12.1-18-03, 12.1-29-01,
12.1-29-02, or 12.1-29-03, or an equivalent federal law or local ordinance, in which the
victim is a minor or is otherwise of the age required for the act to be a crime or an
attempt to commit these offenses.
c. "Sexual offense" means a violation of section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-04,
12.1-20-05, 12.1 - 20 - 05.1 , 12.1-20-06, 12.1-20-07, 12.1-20-11, or 12.1 - 20 - 12.1 ,
12.1-20-12.2, or 12.1 - 20 - 12.3 , or chapter 12.1-27.2, or an equivalent federal law or local
ordinance.

S. B. NO. 2043 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2043.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State